Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Control of Fraud and Abuse

205.8451.
Definitions for KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483.

As used in KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Benefit” means the receipt of money, goods, or anything of pecuniary value from the Medical Assistance Program.

“Fraud” means an intentional deception or misrepresentation made by a recipient or a provider with the knowledge that the deception could result in some unauthorized benefit to the recipient or provider or to some other person. It includes any act that constitutes fraud under applicable federal or state law.

“Immediate family member” means a parent, grandparent, spouse, child, stepchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, sibling, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, or grandchild.

“Intentional” or “intentionally” means, with respect to a result or to conduct described by a statute defining an offense, that a person’s conscious objective is to cause that result or to engage in that conduct.

“Knowingly” means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense, that a person is aware that his conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists.

“Medical Assistance Program” means the program of medical assistance as administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in compliance with Title XIX of the Federal Social Security Act and any administrative regulations related thereto.

“Provider” means an individual, company, corporation, association, facility, or institution which is providing or has been approved to provide medical services, goods, or assistance to recipients under the Medical Assistance Program.

“Provider abuse” means, with reference to a health care provider, practices that are inconsistent with sound fiscal, business, or medical practices, and that result in unnecessary cost to the Medical Assistance Program established pursuant to this chapter, or that result in reimbursement for services that are not medically necessary or that fail to meet professionally recognized standards for health care. It also includes practices that result in unnecessary cost to the Medical Assistance Program.

“Recipient” means any person receiving or who has received medical assistance benefits.

“Recipient abuse” means, with reference to a medical assistance recipient, practices that result in unnecessary cost to the Medical Assistance Program or the obtaining of goods, equipment, medicines, or services that are not medically necessary, or that are excessive, or constitute flagrant overuse or misuse of Medical Assistance Program benefits for which the recipient is covered.

“Wantonly” means, with respect to a result or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense, that a person is aware of and consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the result will occur or that the circumstance exists. The risk must be of such nature and degree that disregard thereof constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would observe in the situation. A person who creates such a risk but is unaware thereof solely by reason of voluntary intoxication also acts wantonly with respect thereto.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 222, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 275, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8453.
Responsibility for control of fraud and abuse.

It shall be the responsibility of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Department for Medicaid Services to control recipient and provider fraud and abuse by:

Informing recipients and providers as to the proper utilization of medical services and methods of cost containment;

Establishing appropriate checks and audits within the Medicaid Management Information System to detect possible instances of fraud and abuse;

Sharing information and reports with other departments within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Office of the Attorney General, and any other agencies that are responsible for recipient or provider utilization review; and

Instituting other measures necessary or useful in controlling fraud and abuse.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 223, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 276, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8455.
Recipient Utilization Review Committee — Authority.

To implement provisions of this section, the commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services shall create, no later than July 30, 1994, a Recipient Utilization Review Committee with the authority to:

Review individual recipient utilization or program benefits, recipient medical records, and other additional information or data necessary to make a decision;

Determine if a recipient has utilized the program or services in a fraudulent or abusive manner;

Refer cases of suspected recipient fraud to the Office of the Inspector General in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

Institute administrative actions to restrict or revoke the recipient’s participation in the Medical Assistance Program; and

Initiate actions to recover the value of benefits received by the recipient which were determined to be related to fraudulent or abusive activities.

The Recipient Utilization Review Committee shall be composed of five (5) members as follows: one (1) licensed physician, one (1) representative from the same program benefit area that is the subject of the review, one (1) recipient or representative of medical assistance benefits, one (1) representative of the Surveillance and Utilization Review Subsystems Unit, as required under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and the commissioner of the Department for Public Health, who shall serve by virtue of his or her office.

A medical assistance recipient whose eligibility has been revoked due to defrauding the Medical Assistance Program shall not be eligible for future medical assistance services for a period of not more than one (1) year or until full restitution has been made to the Department for Medicaid Services, whichever comes first.

When a medical assistance recipient whose eligibility has been revoked due to defrauding of the Medical Assistance Program reapplies for coverage, during the period of revocation, due to pregnancy, a communicable disease, or other condition that creates a risk to public health, or a condition which if not treated could result in immediate grave bodily harm, the recipient utilization review committee for the Department for Medicaid Services may change the revoked status of the previously eligible recipient to restricted status if it has been determined that it would be in the best interest of the previously eligible medical assistance recipient to receive coverage for medical assistance services and the person is otherwise eligible. If this change in status is granted, the case shall be reconsidered by the Recipient Utilization Review Committee within sixty (60) days after the restricted status takes effect.

Upon determination by the Recipient Utilization Review Committee of the Department for Medicaid Services that a medical assistance recipient has abused the benefits of the Medical Assistance Program, the recipient shall immediately be assigned and restricted to a managed care primary physician designated by the Department for Medicaid Services. Except in the case of an emergency as defined by the recipient utilization review committee and set forth by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in an administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, the restricted recipient shall be eligible to receive covered services only upon presenting to a participating provider, prior to the receipt of services, a dated written referral by the assigned managed care primary physician. Any participating provider who provides services to a medical assistance recipient in violation of the provisions of this subsection shall not be eligible for reimbursement for any services rendered.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall request any waivers of federal law that are necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

The provisions of paragraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (1) of this section and of subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section shall have no force or effect until and unless the requested waivers are granted.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to waive the recipient’s or provider’s rights to prior notice and hearing as guaranteed by federal law.

All complaints received by the Department for Medicaid Services, the Office of the Inspector General, the Office of the Attorney General, or by personnel of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services concerning possible fraud or abuse by a medical assistance recipient shall be forwarded immediately to the Recipient Utilization Review Committee for its consideration. Any cases of possible recipient fraud or abuse uncovered by personnel of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or by providers shall also be referred immediately to the Recipient Utilization Review Committee for its review. Records shall be kept of all cases, including records of disposition, considered by the Recipient Utilization Review Committee.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 224, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 277, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8457.
Responsibility of managed care primary physician.

Any provider agreeing to participate as a managed care primary physician of the state’s Medical Assistance Program shall be responsible for prior approval of all medical-related services and goods, except transportation, of recipients assigned to the primary physician’s care as set forth under administrative regulation promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. No primary physician may delegate that primary physician’s authority to anyone except a provider designated by the managed care primary physician to temporarily be responsible for the primary physician’s managed care patients during the primary physician’s absence. The temporarily designated provider shall be approved by the Department for Medicaid Services. Procedures for delegation of authority to a temporarily designated provider shall be approved by the Department for Medicaid Services in accordance with any applicable federal laws or regulations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 225, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 278, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8459.
Emergency service.

Any provider presented with a request for an emergency service, for a nonlife-threatening condition or a condition that would not result in irreparable harm, by a Medicaid recipient participating in a managed care program but not in a restricted Medicaid status, shall not provide the service on an emergency basis unless the provider first makes a reasonable effort to contact the recipient’s designated managed care primary physician for prior approval. Any provider presented with a request for an emergency service, due to a life-threatening condition or a condition that would result in irreparable harm, by a Medicaid recipient participating in a managed care program but not in a restricted Medicaid status, may provide the service without prior approval from the recipient’s designated managed care primary physician.

For the purposes of implementing KRS 205.8455, 205.8457, and this section, the Department for Medicaid Services, in consultation with the Recipient Utilization Review Committee, shall in conformity with the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act (42 U.S.C. sec. 1395dd, as amended) and any other applicable federal law, and in administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, define an emergency service, irreparable harm, immediate grave bodily harm, life-threatening condition, and nonlife-threatening condition.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

205.8461.
Unlawful referral practices of provider — Penalties.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS 205.510 to 205.630, no provider shall knowingly solicit, receive, or offer any remuneration (including any kickback, bribe, or rebate) for furnishing medical assistance benefits or in return for purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for or recommending purchasing, leasing, or ordering any goods, facility, service, or item for which payment may be made pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

No provider shall knowingly make, offer, or receive a payment, a rebate of a fee, or a charge for referring a recipient to another provider for furnishing of benefits.
(2) (a)

No provider shall knowingly make, offer, or receive a payment, a rebate of a fee, or a charge for referring a recipient to another provider for furnishing of benefits.

Any conduct or activity which does not violate or which is protected under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395nn or 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320A-7b(b), as amended, or federal regulations promulgated under those statutes, shall not be deemed to violate the provisions of KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483, and the conduct or activity shall be accorded the same protections allowed under federal law and regulation.

Any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless the combination or aggregation of offenses is valued at three hundred dollars ($300) or more, in which case it shall be a Class D felony. In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, any person who violates the provisions of subsection (2)(a) of this section shall not be entitled to bill or collect from the recipient or any third-party payor and shall repay any payments due the Commonwealth for services provided which were related to the referral.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

205.8463.
Fraudulent acts — Penalties.

No person shall knowingly or wantonly devise a scheme or plan a scheme or artifice, or enter into an agreement, combination, or conspiracy to obtain or aid another in obtaining payments from any medical assistance program under this chapter by means of any fictitious, false, or fraudulent application, claim, report, or document submitted to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or intentionally engage in conduct which advances the scheme or artifice.

No person shall intentionally, knowingly, or wantonly make, present, or cause to be made or presented to an employee or officer of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement, representation, or entry in any application, claim, report, or document used in determining rights to any benefit or payment.

No person shall, with intent to defraud, knowingly make, or induce, or seek to induce the making of a false statement or false representation of a material fact with respect to the conditions or operations of an institution or facility in order that the institution or facility may qualify, upon initial certification or upon recertification, as a hospital, skilled-nursing facility, intermediate-care facility, home-health agency, or other provider of services to the Medical Assistance Program.

No person shall, in any matter within the jurisdiction of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under this chapter, knowingly falsify, conceal, or cover up by any trick, scheme, or device a material fact, or make any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or representation, or make or use any false writing or document knowing the same to contain any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or entry.

Any person who violates subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor unless:
(5) (a)

Any person who violates subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor unless:

The sum total of benefits or payments claimed in any application, claim, report, or document, or in any combination or aggregation thereof, is valued at five hundred dollars ($500) or more but less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;

The sum total of benefits or payments claimed in any application, claim, report, or document, or in any combination or aggregation thereof, is valued at or above one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class D felony; or

The person has three (3) or more convictions under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph within the last five (5) years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered.

If any person commits two (2) or more separate violations of subsections (1) and (2) of this section within ninety (90) days, the offenses may be combined and treated as a single offense, and the value of the property in each offense may be aggregated for the purpose of determining the appropriate charge.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 226, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 279, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 66, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

205.8465.
Mandatory reporting of violations — Confidentiality — Prohibition against employer discrimination or retaliation.

Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter has been or is being committed by any person, corporation, or entity, shall report or cause to be reported to the state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit, or the Medicaid Fraud and Abuse hotline, the following information, if known:

The name and address of the offender;

The offender’s place of employment;

The nature and extent of the violation;

The identity of the complainant; and

Any other information that the receiving person reasonably believes might be helpful in investigation of the alleged fraud, abuse, or misappropriation.

The identity of any person making a report under this section shall be considered confidential by the receiving party. Any person making a report under this section regarding the offenses of another shall not be liable in any civil or criminal action based on the report if it was made in good faith.

No employer shall, without just cause, discharge or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against any person who in good faith makes a report required or permitted by KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483, testifies, or is about to testify, in any proceeding with regard to any report or investigation. Any individual injured by any act in violation of the provisions of this subsection shall have a civil cause of action in Circuit Court to enjoin further violations, and to recover the actual damages sustained, together with the costs of the lawsuit, including a reasonable fee for the individual’s attorney of record.

No employee of the state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit, the Office of the Attorney General, the Office of the Inspector General, or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall notify the alleged offender of the identity of the person who in good faith makes a report required or permitted by KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483 nor shall the employee notify the alleged offender that a report has been made alleging a violation of KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483 until such time as civil or criminal proceedings have been initiated or a formal investigation has been initiated. Any information or report concerning an alleged offender shall be considered confidential in accordance with the Kentucky Open Records Law, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

The state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit shall periodically publicize the provisions of this subsection.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 227, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 280, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8467.
Liability of violators — Payment of penalties to Medicaid trust fund.

Any provider who has been found by a preponderance of the evidence in an administrative process, in conformity with any applicable federal regulations and with due process protections, to have knowingly submitted or caused claims to be submitted for payment for furnishing treatment, services, or goods under a medical assistance program provided under this chapter, which payment the provider was not entitled to receive by reason of a violation of this chapter, shall:

Be liable for restitution of any payments received in violation of this chapter, and interest at the maximum legal rate pursuant to KRS 360.010 in effect on the date any payment was made, for the period from the date payment was made to the date of repayment to the Commonwealth;

Be liable for a civil payment in an amount up to three (3) times the amount of excess payments;

Be liable for payment of a civil payment of five hundred dollars ($500) for each false or fraudulent claim submitted for providing treatment, services, or goods;

Be liable for payment of legal fees and costs of investigation and enforcement of civil payments; and

Be removed as a participating provider in the Medical Assistance Program for two (2) months to six (6) months for a first offense, for six (6) months to one (1) year for a second offense, and for one (1) year to five (5) years for a third offense.

Civil payments, interest, costs of investigation, and enforcement of the civil remedies recovered on behalf of the Commonwealth under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in a Medicaid trust fund which is hereby created and shall not lapse. Funds deposited in the Medicaid trust fund shall not be spent until appropriated by the General Assembly for medical assistance services.

The remedies under this section are separate from and cumulative to any other administrative, civil, or criminal remedies available under federal or state law or regulation.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, may promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, for the administration of the civil payments contained in this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 228, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 281, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8469.
Enforcement proceedings by Attorney General.

The Attorney General, on behalf of the Commonwealth, may commence proceedings to enforce KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483, and to prosecute for all other criminal offenses that involve or are directly related to the use of any Medical Assistance Program funds or services provided under this chapter.

In enforcing KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483, the Attorney General may subpoena witnesses or documents to the grand jury, District Court, or Circuit Court of the county or counties where venue lies, and subpoena witnesses or documents to the Office of the Attorney General to secure testimony for use in civil or criminal trials, investigations, or hearings affecting the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 229, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 282, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8471.
Lien on property of provider or recipient defrauding Medicaid program.

The Commonwealth shall have a lien against all property of any provider or recipient who is found to have defrauded the Medicaid program for an amount equal to the sum defrauded plus any interest and penalties levied under KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483. The lien shall attach to all property and rights to property owned by the provider or recipient and all property subsequently acquired after a finding of fraud by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

The lien imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall not be defeated by gift, devise, sale, alienation, or any other means, and shall include the sum defrauded and all interest, penalties, fees, or other expenses associated with collection of the debt. The lien shall have priority over any other lien or obligation against the property, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The lien imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall not be valid as against any purchaser, judgment lien creditor, or holder of a security interest or mechanic’s lien which was filed prior to the date on which notice of the lien created by this section is filed by the secretary for health and family services or his designee with the county clerk of the county or counties in which the provider’s business or residence is located, or in any county in which the taxpayer has an interest in property. The notice of lien shall be recorded in the same manner as the notice of lis pendens.

The secretary for health and family services shall issue a partial release of any part of the property subject to lien upon payment by the debtor of that portion of the debt and any interest, penalty, or fees covered by the lien on that property.

The secretary for health and family services may enforce the lien created pursuant to this section in the manner provided for the enforcement of statutory liens under KRS 376.110 to 376.130.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 230, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 283, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8473.
Reliance on written governmental advice as defense.

In a prosecution for any violation of the provisions of KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483, it shall be a defense if the person relied on the written advice of an employee or agent of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the advice constitutes a defense under any of the provisions of KRS 501.070.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 231, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 284, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8475.
Forfeiture of provider’s license.

Any professional, licensed or regulated by any agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, who upon final and unappealable decision by a court of competent jurisdiction, is convicted or pleads guilty to a violation of any of the criminal provisions of KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483, shall, in addition to any other penalty provided by law, forfeit the license to practice his or her profession for a mandatory minimum period of five (5) years. The license to practice a profession shall be reinstated only after compliance with all conditions for reinstatement contained in administrative regulations of the applicable licensure or regulatory board or agency promulgated pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A. For purposes of this subsection, an individual or entity is considered to have been “convicted” of an offense when:

A judgment of conviction has been entered against the individual or entity by a federal or state court;

There has been a finding of guilt against the individual or entity by any court of competent jurisdiction;

A plea of guilty by the individual or entity has been accepted by any court of competent jurisdiction; or

The individual or entity has entered into participation in a court imposed first offender, deferred adjudication, diversion, or other arrangement or program where judgment of conviction has been withheld.

Pending the final and unappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction, as provided under subsection (1) of this section, the provider shall not be eligible to participate in the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program.

No provider, owner, officer, or stockholder possessing more than forty percent (40%) of the shares of a provider shall receive payments for medical services or receive profits or remuneration from any other medical assistance provider with which the provider, owner, officer, or stockholder may thereafter become associated until all criminal penalties or civil payments assessed against the provider, owner, officer, or stockholder under KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483 have been satisfied.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 13, effective July 15, 1994.

205.8477.
Disclosure requirements for Medicaid providers, fiscal agents, and managed care entities — Disclosure requirements for owners and investors of health facilities and health services — When disclosure must be provided.

Each Medicaid provider, other than an individual practitioner or group of practitioners, fiscal agent that processes or pays vendor claims on behalf of the Medicaid agency, and managed care entity shall file a disclosure with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in accordance with 42 C.F.R. sec. 455.104 .

Each owner of or direct financial investor in any health facility or health service which dispenses or supplies drugs, medicines, medical devices, or durable medical equipment to a patient shall file a disclosure with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of the names and addresses of any immediate family member who is authorized under state law to prescribe drugs or medicines or medical devices or equipment.

Each provider shall, as a condition of participation in the Medical Assistance Program, file a disclosure with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in accordance with 42 C.F.R. sec. 455.105 relating to business transactions and in accordance with 42 C.F.R. sec. 455.106 relating to information on persons convicted of crimes.

Disclosures required under this statute shall be provided at any of the following times or as otherwise provided by law:

Upon submitting a provider application;

Upon executing a provider agreement;

Upon request of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services during a provider’s revalidation of enrollment;

Within thirty-five (35) days after any change in ownership of a health facility or health service, fiscal agent, or managed care entity;

Upon the submission of a proposal in accordance with the state’s procurement process by a fiscal agent or by a managed care entity;

Upon execution, renewal, or extension of a contract by the state with a fiscal agent or a managed care entity; or

Upon written request within thirty-five (35) days by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 232, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 285, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 80, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

205.8479.
Report of license or certificate suspension, revocation, or limitation.

Any provider licensed or certified under the laws of the Commonwealth whose license or certificate to practice is suspended, revoked, limited, or otherwise restricted shall have that fact reported to the medical assistance program by the respective licensure or regulatory board or agency within five (5) working days of the action.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 15, effective July 15, 1994.

205.8481.
Prohibition against representation of provider by staff of Attorney General in private practice.

No staff of the Office of the Attorney General shall, in private practice of law, serve as legal counsel to or represent any provider, as defined in KRS 205.8451. Designated staff of the Office of the Attorney General shall work in cooperation with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in any initiation of disciplinary proceedings against a health-care provider as defined in KRS 205.8451 and as may be authorized or required under KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483 for violations of KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 233, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 286, effective June 20, 2005.

205.8483.
Toll-free hotline for receiving reports of fraud and abuse — Report.

The Office of the Inspector General in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall establish, maintain, and publicize a twenty-four (24) hour toll-free hotline for the purpose of receiving reports of alleged fraud and abuse by Medical Assistance Program recipients and participating providers.

The Office of the Inspector General in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall develop and implement procedures for screening alleged fraud and abuse of the Medical Assistance Program to ensure that appropriate written referrals are made to:

The state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit and to the Office of the Attorney General of credible allegations of fraud and abuse by providers participating in the Medical Assistance Program; and

Other agencies and licensure boards of all allegations received on the hotline that are relevant to their jurisdiction.

The Office of the Inspector General in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide, upon request, a Medicaid fraud and abuse report that shall include but not be limited to the following information from the prior fiscal year:

The number and type of reports received in the Office of the Inspector General in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, from the Medicaid fraud and abuse hotline categorized by recipient and provider groups;and

The number and type of alleged Medicaid recipient fraud and abuse reports which were opened for investigation by the Office of Inspector General and their disposition.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 96, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 234, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 287, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 37, effective June 29, 2017.

205.850.
Prohibited activities — Exception — Commencement of proceedings for enforcement. [Repealed.]

205.855.
Defense in prosecution. [Repealed.]